dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="schm/elzen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>elzen</l>   <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>elzend</l>  <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ilz</l>     <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>elzt</l>    <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>elze</l>    <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ilzt</l>    <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ilzt</l>    <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>elzen</l>   <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>elzt</l>    <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>elzen</l>   <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>olz</l>     <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>olzt</l>    <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>olz</l>     <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>olzen</l>   <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>olzt</l>    <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>olzen</l>   <r>elzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="schr/eien__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>eien</l>    <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eiend</l>   <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ei</l>      <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eit</l>     <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eie</l>     <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eist</l>    <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eit</l>     <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eien</l>    <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eit</l>     <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eien</l>    <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ie</l>      <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iest</l>    <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ie</l>      <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ien</l>     <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iet</l>     <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ien</l>     <r>eien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="schw/eigen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>eigen</l>   <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eigend</l>  <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eig</l>     <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eigt</l>    <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eige</l>    <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eigst</l>   <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eigt</l>    <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eigen</l>   <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eigt</l>    <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eigen</l>   <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieg</l>     <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iegst</l>   <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieg</l>     <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iegen</l>   <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iegt</l>    <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iegen</l>   <r>eigen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="schw/immen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>immen</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>immend</l>  <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>imme</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>immst</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>immt</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>immen</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>immt</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>immen</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>amm</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ammst</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>amm</l>     <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ammen</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ammt</l>    <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ammen</l>   <r>immen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="schmelzen"><i>schm</i><par n="schm/elzen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schreien"><i>schr</i><par n="schr/eien__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schweigen"><i>schw</i><par n="schw/eigen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schwimmen"><i>schw</i><par n="schw/immen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="speien"><i>sp</i><par n="schr/eien__vblex"/></e>
